California, session 20252026, SB670.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84901 of the Education Code is amended to read:84901. For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply, unless otherwise specified:(a) “Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older.(b) “Carryover” means the amount of unspent adult education program funds from the prior fiscal year, certified on or before September 1 of the current fiscal year, expressed as a percentage of the prior fiscal year’s allocation.(c) “Consortium” means an adult education consortium approved pursuant to this article.(d) “Executive director” means the executive director of the State Board of Education.(e) “Immigrant integration” means a two-way process in which immigrants and the receiving society work together to build secure, thriving, cohesive, and inclusive communities. In the process, immigrants are embraced and welcomed by the receiving society with effective, culturally relevant, and linguistically accessible programs and services that facilitate their linguistic, economic, civic, and social integration and provide upward social and economic mobility, increased civic participation, and multigenerational integration, and service providers encourage immigrants to maximize their contributions to the economic and civic life of their communities.(f) “Program” means the Adult Education Program established by Section 84900.